Utah statutes.
34-29-3.   License -- Application.

Any person applying for a license under the provisions of this chapter shall make application to the board of city commissioners, city council or board of town trustees, or the county executive for the same and shall deposit with the city, town or county treasurer in advance the annual fee for such license, to be evidenced by the receipt of the city, town or county treasurer endorsed on the application. If the board of city commissioners, city council, board of town trustees, or the county executive refuses to order the issuance of such license to the party applying for the same, the sum so deposited with the city, town or county treasurer shall be refunded to the applicant for license without any further action of the governing body.

